Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2838
Practitioner, defined.

Practitioner means a certified registered nurse anesthetist, a certified nurse midwife, a dentist, an optometrist, a nurse practitioner, a physician assistant, a physician, a podiatrist, or a veterinarian.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 934.